District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

6-301.18

Acceptance of financial assistance authorized; urban renewal projects.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 2, 1946, ch. 736, § 20
July 15, 1949, 63 Stat. 441, ch. 338, title VI,§ 609
Aug. 2, 1954, 68 Stat. 630, ch. 649, title III, § 316
Aug. 10, 1965, 79 Stat. 484, Pub. L. 89-117, title III, § 317
May 25, 1967, 81 Stat. 20, Pub. L. 90-19, § 3
Aug. 17, 1982, D.C. Law 4-140, § 2(e), 29 DCR 2862
Nov. 13. 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 232(e), 50 DCR 5668

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-818.
1973 Ed., § 5-717a.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority under Law 4-140, see Mayor’s Order 83-127, May 10, 1983.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402 (123), (124), and (125) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.